Utah statutes.
26-21-17.   Department agency of state to contract for certification of facilities under Social Security Act.

The department is the sole agency of the state authorized to enter into a contract with the United States government for the certification of health care facilities under Title XVIII and Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and any amendments thereto.



Amended by Chapter 114, 1990 General Session

